Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-10,146
Nail technology salon owner; responsibilities.

The owner of each nail technology salon shall have full responsibility for ensuring that the salon is operated in compliance with all applicable laws, rules, and regulations and shall be liable for any and all violations occurring in the salon.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 66;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,217;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 408.